Utah statutes.
53A-6-301.    Utah Professional Practices Advisory Commission.

The Utah Professional Practices Advisory Commission, UPPAC, is established to assist and advise the board in matters relating to the professional practices of educators.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 108, 1999 General Session

